Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.571

Early learning facilities grant and loan program—Oversight, in consultation with the department of children, youth, and families—Head state agency—Use of funds.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1314.SL) ***

(1) The department, in consultation with the department of children, youth, and families, shall oversee the early learning facilities revolving account and the early learning facilities development account, and is the lead state agency for the early learning facilities grant and loan program.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature that state funds invested in the accounts be matched by private or local government funding. Every effort shall be made to maximize funding available for early learning facilities from public schools, community colleges, educational service districts, local governments, and private funders.

(3) Amounts used for program administration by the department may not exceed an average of four percent of the appropriated funds.

(4) Commitment of state funds for construction, purchase, or renovation of early learning facilities may be given only after private or public match funds are committed. Private or public match funds may consist of cash, equipment, land, buildings, or like-kind. In determining the level of match required, the department shall take into consideration the financial need of the applicant and the economic conditions of the location of the proposed facility.

[2018 c 58 s 5; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 43.31.565.